Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1321.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part II of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43MILITARY SPOUSE LEAVE ANDEMPLOYMENT PROTECTION ACTSec.4301. Definitions.4302. Leaves of absence for military spouses.4303. Anti-retaliation protection.4304. Employment protection.4305. Right of employer to provide additional leave.123456789101112131415161718 § 4301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employee." An individual who performs service for hire for an employer for an average of 20 or more hours per week, including all individuals employed at any site owned or operated by an employer. The term does not include an independent contractor."Employer." A person, including the Commonwealth, a public authority or other governmental subdivision of any kind, that employs 20 or more employees at at least one site."Period of military conflict." A period of war declared by the Congress of the United States or in which a member of a reserve component of the armed forces is ordered to active duty under 10 U.S.C. §§ 12301 (relating to reserve components generally) and 12302 (relating to ready reserve).§ 4302. Leaves of absence for military spouses.An employee whose spouse is a member of the armed forces of the United States, National Guard or a reserve component shall be allowed a leave of absence by the employee's employer as follows:(1) No more than 14 days per year of paid leave:(i) when the spouse of the employee has been deployed during a period of military conflict to a combat theater or combat zone of operations; or(ii) during a time of emergency or natural disaster declared by the President or the Governor.(2) No more than 14 days per year of unpaid leave when the spouse of the employee has been deployed for training 20250HB1321PN1513 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes.§ 4303. Anti-retaliation protection.An employer may not retaliate against an employee for requesting or obtaining a leave of absence as provided under section 4302 (relating to leaves of absence for military spouses).§ 4304. Employment protection.An employer shall maintain the employment of an employee while on a leave of absence under section 4302 (relating to leaves of absence for military spouses), including the employee's position, title and benefits accrued at the time the leave is taken.§ 4305. Right of employer to provide additional leave.The provisions of this act shall not affect or prevent an employer from providing leave for employees in addition to the leave provided under this act. The provisions of this act shall not affect an employee's rights with respect to any other employee benefit provided under law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1321PN1513 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819